Massachusetts, session 194th, S896.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 9A of chapter 176O of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official
Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after clause (e), in line 32, the following clause:-
(f) limits the ability of the health care provider to negotiate a rate increase with a carrier
that exceeds the health care cost growth benchmark as established in Chapter 6D of section 9 of
the general laws.
of 1